District of Columbia statutes.
35-253

Penalties.

Violation of § 35-251(b) shall be punishable by a fine of not less than $10 nor more than $50 for a 1st offense and by a fine of not less than $50 nor more than $100 or by imprisonment for not more than 10 days or both for each 2nd or subsequent offense. A violation of § 35-251(c) or (d) shall be punishable by a fine of not more than $300, imprisonment of not more than 90 days, not fewer than 30 hours of community service, or a combination of any 2 penalties, except that imprisonment and community service shall not be imposed together. A violation of § 35-216 shall be punishable by a fine of not more than $300, by imprisonment for not more than 10 days, or both. All prosecutions under §§ 35-216 and 35-251 to 35-253 shall be brought by the Corporation Counsel.

Sept. 23, 1975, D.C. Law 1-18, § 5, formerly § 4, 22 DCR 1995
renumbered, Feb. 22, 1978, D.C. Law 2-40, § 2(b), 24 DCR 3344
June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-91, § 3(b), 31 DCR 2539
Oct. 1, 1992, D.C. Law 9-171, § 2(b), 39 DCR 5831
1973 Ed., § 44-218.
1981 Ed., § 44-226.
This section is referenced in § 35-251.